Utah statutes.
17B-1-408.   Resolution indicating whether the requested service will be
provided.
(1)  Within 30 days after the last hearing required under Section 17B-1-407 is
held, the legislative body of each county and municipality that sent a notice
of intent under Subsection 17B-1-407(1) shall adopt a resolution indicating
whether the county or municipality will provide to the area proposed for
annexation within its boundaries the service proposed to be provided by the
proposed annexing local district.
(2)  If the county or municipal legislative body fails to adopt a resolution
within the time provided under Subsection (1), the county or municipality
shall be considered to have declined to provide the service.
(3)  If a county or municipal legislative body adopts a resolution under
Subsection (1) indicating that the county or municipality will provide the
service but the county or municipality does not, within 120 days after the
adoption of that resolution, take substantial measures to provide the service,
the county or municipality shall be considered to have declined to provide the
service.
(4)  Each county or municipality whose legislative body adopts a resolution
under Subsection (1) indicating that the county or municipality will provide
the service shall diligently proceed to take all measures necessary to provide
the service.
(5)  If a county or municipal legislative body adopts a resolution under
Subsection (1) indicating that the county or municipality will provide the
service and the county or municipality takes substantial measures within the
time provided in Subsection (3) to provide the service, the local district's
annexation proceeding as to the applicable area of that county or municipality
is terminated and that applicable area is considered deleted from the area
proposed to be annexed in a petition under Subsection 17B-1-403(1)(a).
